Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. Disclosure and Action to Prevent Violations.

Sec. 39.52.210.
Declaration of potential violations by public employees.

A public employee who is involved in a matter that may result in a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

shall

refrain from taking any official action relating to the matter until a determination is made under this section; and

immediately disclose the matter in writing to the designated supervisor and the attorney general.

A public employee’s designated supervisor shall make a written determination whether an employee’s involvement violates AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

and shall provide a copy of the written determination to the public employee and to the attorney general. If the supervisor determines that a violation could exist or will occur, the supervisor shall,

reassign duties to cure the employee’s potential violation, if feasible; or

direct the divestiture or removal by the employee of the personal or financial interests that give rise to the potential violation.

A designated supervisor may request guidance from the attorney general, in accordance with AS

39.52.240

, when determining whether a public employee is involved in a matter that may result in a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am §§ 87, 88 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.220.
Declaration of potential violations by members of boards or commissions.

A member of a board or commission who is involved in a matter that may result in a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

shall disclose the matter on the public record and in writing to the designated supervisor and to the attorney general. The supervisor shall determine whether the member’s involvement violates AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

and shall provide a copy of the written determination to the board or commission member and to the attorney general. If a member of the board or commission objects to the ruling of the supervisor, or if the supervisor discloses an involvement requiring a determination, the members present at a meeting, excluding the involved member, shall vote on the matter. If the supervisor or a majority of the members voting determine that a violation will exist if the member continues to participate, the member shall refrain from voting, deliberating, or participating in the matter.

The designated supervisor or the board or commission may request guidance from the attorney general, in accordance with AS

39.52.240

, when determining whether a member of a board or commission is involved in a matter that may result in a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 89 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.225.
Disclosures in connection with executive clemency.

Before granting executive clemency to an applicant for executive clemency, the governor shall disclose in writing to the attorney general whether granting the clemency would benefit a personal or financial interest of the governor. The attorney general shall publish a written determination whether granting executive clemency to the applicant would violate AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

. The written determination of the attorney general is not confidential, but information set out in that determination identifying a person, other than the applicant for clemency, who is a victim or witness in a criminal matter may not be made public.

History.

(§ 70 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.52.230.
Reporting of potential violations.

A person may report to a public officer’s designated supervisor, under oath and in writing, a potential violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

by the public officer. The supervisor shall provide a copy of the report to the officer who is the subject of the report and to the attorney general, and shall review the report to determine whether a violation may exist. The supervisor shall act in accordance with AS

39.52.210

or

39.52.220

if the supervisor determines that the matter may result in a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 90 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.240.
Advisory opinions.

Upon the written request of a designated supervisor or a board or commission, the attorney general shall issue opinions interpreting this chapter. The requester must supply any additional information requested by the attorney general in order to issue the opinion. Within 60 days after receiving a complete request, the attorney general shall issue an advisory opinion on the question.

The attorney general may offer oral advice if delay would cause substantial inconvenience or detriment to the requesting party.

The designated supervisor or a board or commission shall make a written determination based on the advice of the attorney general. If the advice of the attorney general provides more than one way for a public officer to avoid or correct a problem found under AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

, the designated supervisor or the board or commission shall, after consultation with the officer, determine the alternative that is most appropriate and advise the officer of any action required of the officer to avoid or correct the problem.

A public officer is not liable under this chapter for any action carried out in accordance with a determination made under AS

39.52.210

—

39.52.240

if the officer fully disclosed all relevant facts reasonably necessary to the determination.

The attorney general may reconsider, revoke, or modify an advisory opinion at any time, including upon a showing that material facts were omitted or misstated in the request for the opinion.

A person may rely on an advisory opinion that is currently in effect.

A request for advice made under (a) of this section is confidential.

The attorney general shall post on the Alaska Online Public Notice System (AS

44.62.175

), with sufficient deletions to prevent disclosure of the persons whose identities are confidential under (g) of this section, the advisory opinions issued under this section that the attorney general determines to be of major import because of their general applicability to executive branch officers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.250.
Advice to former public officers.

A former public officer may request, in writing, an opinion from the attorney general interpreting this chapter. The attorney general shall give advice in accordance with AS

39.52.240(a)

or (b) and publish opinions in accordance with AS

39.52.240(h)

.

A former public officer is not liable under this chapter for any action carried out in accordance with the advice of the attorney general issued under this section, if the public officer fully disclosed all relevant facts reasonably necessary to the issuance of the advice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Sec. 39.52.260.
Designated supervisor’s report and attorney general review.

A designated supervisor shall quarterly submit a report to the attorney general which states the facts, circumstances, and disposition of any disclosure made under AS

39.52.210

—

39.52.240

.

The attorney general shall review determinations reported under this section. The attorney general may request additional information from a supervisor concerning a specific disclosure and its disposition.

The report prepared under this section is confidential and not available for public inspection unless formal proceedings under AS

39.52.350

are initiated based on the report. If formal proceedings are initiated, the relevant portions of the report are public documents open to inspection. The attorney general shall, however, make available to the public a summary of the reports received under this section, with sufficient deletions to prevent disclosure of a person’s identity.

The attorney general shall submit to the personnel board a copy of the quarterly reports received from designated supervisors under (a) of this section together with a report on the attorney general’s review conducted under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 91 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.270.
Disclosure statements.

A public officer required to file a disclosure statement under this chapter shall meet the requirements of this subsection in making the disclosure. When the public officer files a disclosure statement under this chapter, the public officer signing the disclosure shall certify that, to the best of the public officer’s knowledge, the statement is true, correct, and complete. The disclosure must state that, in addition to any other penalty or punishment that may apply, a person who submits a false statement that the person does not believe to be true is punishable under AS

11.56.200

—

11.56.240

.

A designated supervisor who receives a disclosure statement under AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.220

shall review it. If the designated supervisor believes that there is a possibility that the activity or situation reported in a disclosure statement filed under AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

may result in a violation of this chapter, the designated supervisor shall take appropriate steps under AS

39.52.210

—

39.52.240

. Failure of the designated supervisor to proceed under AS

39.52.210

—

39.52.240

does not relieve the public officer of the public officer’s obligations under those statutes.

In this section, “disclosure statement” means a report or written notice filed under AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.220

.

History.

(§ 92 ch 74 SLA 1998)